Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.595

Public transportation fares—Powers and authority are supplemental to other laws.

The powers and authority conferred by RCW 35.58.580 through 35.58.590 shall be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and nothing contained therein shall be construed as limiting any other powers or authority of any public agency.

[ 2008 c 123 s 4.]